Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.020

License required.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice, or offer to practice, geology for others in this state, or to use in connection with his or her name or otherwise assume or advertise any title or description tending to convey the impression that he or she is a licensed geologist, or other licensed specialty geologist title, unless the person has been licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice geology, within the meaning and intent of this chapter, if the person:

(a) Practices any branch of the profession of geology;

(b) By verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other way represents himself or herself to be a geologist;

(c) Through the use of some other title implies that he or she is a geologist or that he or she is licensed under this chapter; or

(d) Holds himself or herself out as able to perform or does perform any geological services or work recognized by the board as the practice of geology for others.

[ 2000 c 253 s 2.]